North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Part 2. Voting.

§ 55A-7-20.
Members’ list for meeting.

After fixing a record date for a notice of a meeting, a corporation shall prepare an alphabetical list of the names of all its members who are entitled to notice of the meeting. The list shall show the address and number of votes each member is entitled to cast at the meeting. The corporation shall prepare on a current basis through the time of the membership meeting a list of members, if any, who are entitled to vote at the meeting, but not entitled to notice of the meeting. This list shall be prepared on the same basis as and be part of the list of members.

Beginning two business days after notice is given of the meeting for which the list was prepared and continuing through the meeting, the list of members shall be available for inspection by any member for the purpose of communication with other members concerning the meeting. The list shall be available (i) at the corporation’s principal office or at a reasonable place identified in the meeting notice in the city where the meeting will be held or (ii) on a reasonably accessible electronic network, provided that the information required to gain access to the list is provided with the notice of the meeting. In the event that the corporation determines to make the list available on an electronic network, the corporation may take reasonable steps to ensure that the information is available only to shareholders of the corporation. A member, personally or by or with the member’s representatives, is entitled on written demand to inspect and, subject to the limitations of G.S. 55A-16-02(c) and

G.S. 55A-16-05

and at the member’s expense, to copy the list at a reasonable time during the period it is available for inspection.

If the meeting is to be held at a place, the corporation shall make the list of members available at the meeting, and any member, personally or by or with the member’s representatives, is entitled to inspect the list at any time during the meeting or any adjournment. If the meeting is to be held solely by means of remote communication, then the list shall also be open to inspection during the meeting on a reasonably accessible electronic network, and the information required to access the list shall be provided with the notice of the meeting.

If the corporation refuses to allow a member or the member’s representative to inspect or copy the list of members as permitted in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, the superior court of the county where a corporation’s principal office, or, if there is none in this State, its registered office, is located, on application of the member, after notice is given to the corporation and upon such further evidence, notice and opportunity to be heard, if any, as the court may deem appropriate under the circumstances, may summarily order the inspection or copying at the corporation’s expense. The court may postpone the meeting for which the list was prepared until the inspection or copying is complete and may order the corporation to pay the member’s costs, including reasonable attorneys’ fees, incurred to obtain the order.

Refusal or failure to prepare or make available the members’ list does not affect the validity of action taken at the meeting.

History.

1993, c. 398, s. 1; 2021-162, s. 2(n).

North Carolina Commentary

This section had no counterpart in the prior law and is based on the Model Act. The list required by this section must include the name and address and number of votes each member is entitled to cast at the meeting and must be updated to and including the date of the meeting. The need to update the list would only occur if members entitled to vote at the meeting join the corporation after the notice of the meeting is given.

§ 55A-7-21.
Voting entitlement generally.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, each member is entitled to one vote on each matter voted on by the members.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, if a membership stands of record in the names of two or more persons, their acts with respect to voting shall have the following effect:

If only one votes, such act binds all; and

If more than one votes, the vote shall be divided on a pro rata basis.

An amendment to the articles of incorporation or bylaws on which members are entitled to vote, the purpose of which is to increase or decrease the number of votes any member is entitled to cast on any member action, shall be approved by the members entitled to vote on that action by a vote that would be sufficient to take the action before the amendment.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 35; 1993, c. 398, s. 1; 1995, c. 400, s. 2.

North Carolina Commentary

Subsection (b), which had no counterpart in the prior law, specifies the manner in which jointly held memberships are voted.

§ 55A-7-22.
Quorum requirements.

Unless this Chapter, the articles of incorporation, or bylaws provide for a higher or lower quorum, ten percent (10%) of the votes entitled to be cast on a matter shall be represented at a meeting of members to constitute a quorum on that matter. Once a member is represented for any purpose at a meeting, the member is deemed present for quorum purposes for the remainder of the meeting and for any adjournment of that meeting unless a new record date is or must be set for that adjourned meeting.

A bylaw amendment to decrease the quorum for any member action may be approved by the members entitled to vote on that action or, unless prohibited by the bylaws, by the board of directors.

A bylaw amendment to increase the quorum required for any member action shall be approved by the members entitled to vote on that action.

Unless one-third or more of the votes entitled to be cast in the election of directors are represented in person or by proxy, the only matters that may be voted upon at an annual or regular meeting of members are those matters that are described in the meeting notice.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

Subsections (b) through (d) had no counterpart in the prior law and were adapted from the Model Act.

§ 55A-7-23.
Voting requirements.

Unless this Chapter, the articles of incorporation, or the bylaws require a greater vote or voting by class, if a quorum is present, the affirmative vote of a majority of the votes cast is the act of the members.

An amendment to the articles of incorporation or bylaws on which members are entitled to vote, the purpose of which is to increase or decrease the vote required for any member action, shall be approved by the members entitled to vote on that action by a vote that would be sufficient to take the action before the amendment.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1; 1995, c. 400, s. 3.

North Carolina Commentary

Former 55A-33 provided that the vote of a majority of “the votes entitled to be cast” at a meeting at which a quorum is present was the act of the members. Subsection (a) provides that “a majority of the votes cast” at a meeting at which a quorum is present is the act of the members, so that members present at a meeting cannot defeat an action by withholding their votes. Subsection (b) had no counterpart in the prior law.

§ 55A-7-24.
Proxies.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws prohibit or limit proxy voting, a member may vote in person or by proxy. A member may appoint one or more proxies to vote or otherwise act for the member by signing an appointment form, either personally or by the member’s attorney-in-fact. An appointment in the form of an electronic record submitted by a member who has agreed as provided in

G.S. 55A-1-70

that either bears the member’s electronic signature or is sent from the member’s designated email address and that may be directly reproduced in paper form by an automated process shall be deemed a valid appointment form within the meaning of this section. In addition, if and to the extent permitted by the nonprofit corporation, a member may appoint one or more proxies by any kind of telephonic transmission, even if not accompanied by written communication, under circumstances or together with information from which the nonprofit corporation can reasonably assume that the appointment was made or authorized by the member.

An appointment of a proxy is effective when received by the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes. An appointment is valid for 11 months unless a different period is expressly provided in the appointment form.

An appointment of a proxy is revocable by the member unless the appointment form conspicuously states that it is irrevocable and the appointment is coupled with an interest. An appointment made irrevocable under this subsection shall be revocable when the interest with which it is coupled is extinguished. A transferee for value of an interest subject to an irrevocable appointment may revoke the appointment if the transferee did not have actual knowledge of its irrevocability.

The death or incapacity of the member appointing a proxy does not affect the right of the corporation to accept the proxy’s authority unless notice of the death or incapacity is received by the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes before the proxy exercises authority under the appointment.

A revocable appointment of a proxy is revoked by the person appointing the proxy [by] doing any of the following:

Attending any meeting and voting in person.

Signing and delivering to the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate proxy votes either a writing stating that the appointment of the proxy is revoked or a subsequent appointment form.

Subject to

G.S. 55A-7-27

and to any express limitation on the proxy’s authority appearing on the face of the appointment form, a corporation is entitled to accept the proxy’s vote or other action as that of the member making the appointment.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 35; 1993, c. 398, s. 1; 1999-139, s. 1; 2008-37, s. 6; 2021-162, s. 2(o).

§ 55A-7-25.
Voting for directors; cumulative voting.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, the bylaws, or an agreement valid under

G.S. 55A-7-30

, directors are elected by a plurality of the votes cast by the members entitled to vote in the election at a meeting at which a quorum is present. If the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or an agreement valid under

G.S. 55A-7-30

provides for cumulative voting by members, members may so vote, by multiplying the number of votes the members are entitled to cast by the number of directors for whom they are entitled to vote, and casting the product for a single candidate or distributing the product among two or more candidates.

Members otherwise entitled to vote cumulatively shall not vote cumulatively at a particular meeting unless:

The meeting notice or statement accompanying the notice states that cumulative voting will take place; or

A member or proxy who has the right to cumulate his votes announces in open meeting, before voting for directors starts, his intention to vote cumulatively; and if such announcement is made, the chair shall declare that all persons entitled to vote have the right to vote cumulatively, shall announce the number of votes entitled to be cast, and shall grant a recess of not less than one hour nor more than four hours, as the chair shall determine, or of such other period of time as is unanimously then agreed upon.

A director elected by cumulative voting may be removed by the members without cause if the requirements of

G.S. 55A-8-08

are met unless the votes cast against removal would be sufficient to elect such director if voted cumulatively at an election at which the same total number of votes were cast and the entire number of directors elected at the time of the director’s most recent election were then being elected.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 35; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

§ 55A-7-26.
Other methods of electing directors.

A corporation may provide in its articles of incorporation or bylaws for election of directors by members or delegates:

On the basis of chapter or other organizational unit;

By region or other geographic unit;

By preferential voting; or

By any other reasonable method.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1973, c. 192, ss. 1, 2; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, ss. 19-21; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “The Nonprofit Corporation in North Carolina: Recognizing a Right to Member Derivative Suits,” see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 999 (1985).

For article, “Duties of Nonprofit Corporate Directors - Emphasizing Oversight Responsibilities,” see 90 N.C. L. Rev. 1845 (2012).

§ 55A-7-27.
Corporation’s acceptance of votes.

If the name signed on a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment corresponds to the name of a member, the corporation if acting in good faith is entitled to accept the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the member.

If the name signed on a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment does not correspond to the record name of a member, the corporation if acting in good faith is nevertheless entitled to accept the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the member if:

The member is an entity and the name signed purports to be that of an officer or agent of the entity;

The name signed purports to be that of an attorney-in-fact of the member and, if the corporation requests it, evidence acceptable to the corporation of the signatory’s authority to sign for the member is presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment;

Two or more persons hold the membership as cotenants or fiduciaries and the name signed purports to be the name of at least one of the coholders and the person signing appears to be acting on behalf of all the coholders; or

In the case of a corporation other than a charitable or religious corporation:

The name signed purports to be that of an administrator, executor, guardian, or conservator representing the member and, if the corporation requests it, evidence of fiduciary status acceptable to the corporation is presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment;

The name signed purports to be that of a receiver or trustee in bankruptcy of the member, and, if the corporation requests it, evidence of this status acceptable to the corporation is presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment.

The corporation is entitled to reject a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment if the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes, acting in good faith, has reasonable basis for doubt about the validity of the signature on it or about the signatory’s authority to sign for the member.

The corporation and its officer or agent who accepts or rejects a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment in good faith and in accordance with the standards of this section are not liable in damages to the member for the consequences of the acceptance or rejection.

Corporate action based on the acceptance or rejection of a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment under this section is valid unless a court of competent jurisdiction determines otherwise.

History.

1993, c. 398, s. 1; 1995, c. 509, s. 27.

North Carolina Commentary

This section had no counterpart in the prior law.

§§ 55A-7-28,
55A-7-29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.